Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-231
Hospital; establishment.

A city of the primary class may (1) purchase or otherwise acquire ground for and erect, establish, operate, regulate, and repair a city hospital or any hospital, the governing board of which is appointed by the mayor or city council, (2) receive donations and bequests of money or property for such hospital facilities in trust or otherwise, and (3) issue bonds of the city for acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, extending, equipping, or furnishing such hospital facilities.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXII, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 4442;

C.S.1922, § 3826;

C.S.1929, § 15-229;

R.S.1943, § 15-231;

Laws 1959, c. 42, § 1, p. 223;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 48.